Mississippi, session 2026, HB813.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The State of Mississippi shall not be required to comply with or recognize any mandates, orders, laws, decrees or directives handed down by the United States federal government that usurps the separation of powers between state and federal governments pursuant to the Tenth Amendment to the United States Constitution. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.